Illinois, session 104th, HB5144.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/MMMM new)7    Sec. MMMM. Sale of adhesive-based traps prohibited. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "adhesive-based trap" means 9any device that is designed or is capable of being used to 10capture a rodent by means of an adhesive substance, including 11devices commonly known as glue traps, glue boards, and any 12similar rodent trap.13    (b) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 14Act for a person to sell, offer for sale, or display for sale 15adhesive-based traps in this State.